Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Generally

Task force. —

Laws 2004, ch. 63, § 1, creates a select legislative committee, consisting of three members of the senate and three representatives of the house to study administrative issues relating to the offices of the secretary of state, state auditor, state treasurer and state superintendent of public instruction. The committee is to study: (1) constitutional and statutory duties assigned to the specified offices; (2) the roles of the offices in the structure of state government; (3) appropriate legal representation of the offices; (4) appropriate budgetary oversight of the offices; and (5) appropriate oversight of staff serving the offices and boards and commissions upon which the specified officers serve. The committee is to report its findings, including any recommendations for statutory changes, to the management council, not later than September 30, 2004. There is appropriated from the general fund to the legislative service office $19,000 or as much thereof as is necessary for purposes of this act

Laws 2004, ch. 63, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of orders and enactments requiring public officers and employees, or candidates for office, to disclose financial condition, interests, or relationships, 22 ALR4th 237.

§ 9-1-101.
Location of seat of government; residence of state officials; deputies authorized; state superintendent of public instruction physical office designation.

The seat of government for the state of Wyoming is located and established at Cheyenne, Wyoming.

The governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state auditor and state superintendent of public instruction shall reside and maintain their offices at the seat of government.

The secretary of state, the state auditor, state treasurer and state superintendent of public instruction may each appoint a deputy to perform the duties of their respective offices and are responsible to the state for the acts of their deputies.

In recognition of Estelle Reel, the first woman elected and to hold the office of state superintendent of public instruction in Wyoming and the second woman elected and to hold a statewide office in the United States, the physical office of the state superintendent of public instruction in the state capitol building shall be designated and known as “The Estelle Reel Office of the State Superintendent of Public Instruction.”

History.

Laws 1890-1891, ch. 95, § 2; 1899, ch. 35, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 55, 187; Laws 1909, ch. 54, § 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 92, 137, 269; C.S. 1920, §§ 102, 146, 308; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-202, 109-1302, 109-1418; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-203, 18-703, 18-704; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-3, 9-4, 9-34; W.S. 1977, §§

9-1-103

, 9-1-106,

9-2-201

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2018 ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (d).

Cross references. —

As to governor's residence, see §§

9-1-213

and

9-5-103

.

For provision requiring office of attorney general to be kept in the state capitol building, see §

9-1-604

.

For constitutional provision that legislature shall meet at the seat of government, see art. 3, § 7, Wyo. Const.

For provision only qualified elector may be appointed to civil office, see art. 6, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to change of location of seat of government, see art. 7, § 23, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision that the legislature shall provide for deputies, see art. 14, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to powers of deputies generally, see §

1-1-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of public officer for the defaults and misfeasance of clerks, assistants or deputies, 71 ALR2d 1140.

§ 9-1-102.
Officers of state agencies and specified state employees to file oath and obtain bond; bond requirements.

Before assuming the duties of office, the chief officer or officers of each state agency, office, institution, board and commission, and any other employee of the state specified by the governor, shall take and subscribe the constitutional oath of office and obtain faithful performance and fidelity bond coverage. The oath shall be filed with the secretary of state.

The department of administration and information shall purchase coverage for employees or officials as required by this section in the amount necessary to:

Insure the honest and faithful performance and discharge of duties;

Insure accounting to the state for all monies, property, materials and records under the care, custody or control of the employees or officials by virtue of their public capacity; and

Assure that upon the termination of their service with the state all monies, property, materials and records shall be turned over to their successors.

Prior to purchasing any bond required under this section the department of administration and information shall obtain the approval of the attorney general.

All bonds purchased under this section shall be acquired from a person, firm or corporation qualified by and holding a valid certificate of authority from the state insurance commissioner.

Bonds and records required under this section are official public records under the Public Records Act.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 22, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 96; Laws 1901, ch. 45, § 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 140, 209; Laws 1913, ch. 63, § 5; C.S. 1920, §§ 149, 222, 623; Laws 1925, ch. 156, § 5; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-907, 108-1005, 109-603, 109-1002; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-903, 18-1202, 19-1305, 19-1406; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-123, 9-144.9 to 9-144.13, 9-250, 9-401, 9-416; Laws 1971, ch. 27, §§ 18 to 22; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-503,

9-2-901

to

9-2-905

, 9-3-1404, 9-6-305, 9-6-406; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

As to qualifications for sureties generally, see §

1-1-105

.

As to public records, see §

16-4-201

et seq.

Public Records Act. —

The reference to the “Public Records Act” in subsection (e) is apparently a reference to §§

16-4-201

to

16-4-205

.

§ 9-1-103.
State elected officials representation on boards and commissions; designees; limitations.

A state elected official may authorize a designee to act as the official’s personal representative to any board or commission of which the official is a member. The designee shall have the right to speak on behalf of the official and to vote and take other lawful action on behalf of the official as a member of the board or commission. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any board or commission to which the state elected official is appointed by the Wyoming constitution or which is comprised solely of state elected officials.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 242, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 242, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2005.